Washington statutes.
RCW 43.181.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commission" means the Washington state housing finance commission.

(2) "Covenant homeownership program study" means an evidence-based written report prepared by or on behalf of the commission as required in RCW 43.181.030.

(3) "Department" means the department of commerce, except as otherwise indicated in RCW 43.181.050.

(4) "First-time homebuyer" means:

(a) An individual or the individual's spouse who has had no ownership in a principal residence during the three-year period ending on the date of purchase of the property;

(b) A single parent who has only owned a home with a former spouse while married;

(c) An individual who is a displaced homemaker as defined in 24 C.F.R. Sec. 93.2 as it exists on July 23, 2023, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, and has only owned a home with a spouse;

(d) An individual who has only owned a principal residence not permanently affixed to a permanent foundation in accordance with applicable regulations; or

(e) An individual who has only owned a property that is determined by a licensed building inspector as being uninhabitable.

(5) "Oversight committee" means the covenant homeownership program oversight committee established in RCW 43.181.050.

(6) "Program" means the covenant homeownership program described in RCW 43.181.040.

(7) "Program participant" means a person who receives down payment and closing cost assistance through a special purpose credit program created by the commission for purposes of the covenant homeownership program.

(8) "Racially restrictive real estate covenant" means a recorded covenant or deed restriction that includes or included racial restrictions on property ownership or use against protected classes that are unlawful under RCW 49.60.224. For example, these unlawful restrictions commonly included exclusions against black, indigenous, and people of color and other historically marginalized communities in Washington state, using terms, many of which are offensive, such as "African blood" meaning all sub-Saharan African ancestries; "Aryan" meaning not Jewish, not eastern or southern European, nor any ancestry except northern European; "Asiatic" meaning all Asian ancestries; Chinese; "colored person" meaning all sub-Saharan African ancestries; "colored races" meaning all nonwhite races; "Ethiopian" meaning all sub-Saharan African ancestries; "gentile" meaning non-Jewish; Hawaiian; "Hebrew" meaning Jewish; "Hindu" meaning all South Asian ancestries; "Indian" meaning Native Americans and also possibly South Asian ancestries; Japanese; "Malay" meaning Filipino; "Mongolian" meaning all East Asian ancestries; "Negro blood" meaning all sub-Saharan African ancestries; "oriental" meaning all Asian ancestries; "Turkish empire" meaning all middle easterners; and "yellow races" meaning all Asian ancestries.

(9) "Special purpose credit program" means a credit assistance program created by the commission as authorized by the federal consumer financial protection bureau under regulation B, 12 C.F.R. 1002.8(a)(1), pursuant to Title VII of the consumer credit protection act (the equal credit opportunity act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1691 et seq.) as amended, allowing a creditor to extend special purpose credit to applicants who meet eligibility requirements under a credit assistance program expressly authorized by state law for the benefit of an economically disadvantaged class of persons.

[ 2023 c 340 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Short title—Conflict with federal requirements—2023 c 340: See notes following RCW 43.181.040.